Idaho, session 2026, H0521.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3008. RELEASE OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION. (1) All
units of state, city, and local governments; and any agency of the state cre-
ated by the legislature that requires, by statute, rule, or local or county
ordinance, fingerprinting of applicants or licensees; and any persons as-
sociated with private, noncriminal justice entities that qualify under the
national child protection act of 1993 and volunteers for children act that
serve vulnerable populations such as children, the elderly, and individuals
with disabilities are authorized to submit fingerprints to the bureau for
examination and for further submission, if necessary, to the federal bureau
of investigation. The bureau shall be the state's sole source of fingerprint
submissions to the federal bureau of investigation for criminal justice and
applicant or licensing purposes to the federal bureau of investigation.
(2) The department shall provide copies of or communicate information
from criminal history records to the following:
(a) Criminal justice agencies and the court;
(b) A person or public agency or private entity, upon written applica-
tion on a form approved by the director and provided by the department,
subject to the following restrictions:
(i) A request for criminal history records must be submitted in
writing or as provided by rule. However, the department shall ac-
cept a request presented in person by the subject of the record;
(ii) The request must identify a specific person by name and date
of birth. Fingerprints of the person named may be required to es-
tablish positive identification;
(iii) Responding to the request does not interfere with the secure
and orderly conduct of the department and would not substantially
prejudice or prevent the carrying out of the functions of the de-
partment;
(iv) A record of an arrest that does not contain a disposition af-
ter twelve (12) months from the date of arrest may only be dissem-
inated by the department to criminal justice agencies, to the sub-


ject of the record, or to a person requesting the criminal history
information with a signed release from the subject of the record;
and
(v) Any release of criminal history data by the department shall
prominently display the statement: "AN ARREST WITHOUT DISPOSI-
TION IS NOT AN INDICATION OF GUILT."
(3) Judicial review of the department's denial of a request for records
shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 74-115, Idaho Code.
(4) A request for a criminal history record by a criminal justice agency
or a court shall take precedence over all other requests. The department
shall adopt rules to set forth the manner by which criminal justice agencies
and courts without direct access to the public safety and security informa-
tion system established by section 19-5202, Idaho Code, may request Idaho
criminal history record information.
(5) Unless otherwise provided by law, access authorized under this
section to criminal history records does not create a duty upon a person,
employer, private entity, or public agency to examine the criminal history
record of an applicant, employee or volunteer.
(6) A person or private entity, or public agency, other than the depart-
ment, shall not disseminate criminal history record information obtained
from the department to a person or agency that is not a criminal justice
agency or a court without a signed release of the subject of record or unless
otherwise provided by law.
(7) Direct access to criminal history record information is regulated
by chapter 52, title 19, Idaho Code, and the rules adopted pursuant to that
chapter.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 30, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3008A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3008A. SUBMISSION BY A COVERED ENTITY FOR FINGERPRINT SCREEN-
ING. (1) Any private, noncriminal justice entities qualifying to partic-
ipate under the national child protection act of 1993 and volunteers for
children act, as amended, that serve vulnerable populations such as chil-
dren, the elderly, and individuals with disabilities are authorized to
submit fingerprints to the bureau for examination and for further submis-
sion, if necessary, to the federal bureau of investigation for a criminal
history records check. The bureau shall be the state's sole source of fin-
gerprint submissions to the federal bureau of investigation for applicant or
licensing purposes.
(2) A qualified entity shall submit a request for fingerprint screen-
ing to the bureau for a covered individual, independent contractor, vendor
employee, or volunteer of the qualified entity who has supervised or unsu-
pervised access to children, the elderly, or individuals with disabilities
for eligibility screening of any state criminal history records and for for-
warding to the federal bureau of investigation for its report on the criminal
history of that person.
(3) The bureau shall provide written notification to any person being
screened regarding the right of the person to obtain a copy of his background
screening report, including without limitation any records of criminal his-


tory contained in the report, to appeal the results of the background screen-
ing report, to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any information
contained therein, and to obtain a determination as to the validity of such a
challenge before the qualified entity makes a final determination as to the
fitness of the person to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of
vulnerable populations.
(4) A request submitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee to the bureau as authorized by
section 67-3010, Idaho Code, plus the amount prescribed by the federal bu-
reau of investigation for its report on the criminal history of the person in
accordance with the provisions of 34 U.S.C. 40102(e).
(5) After a request is submitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, the bureau shall provide directly to the qualified entity:
(a) Any records of criminal history of the person being screened that
are not otherwise confidential pursuant to applicable statute or law;
and
(b) Any records of criminal history of the person being screened that
were received from the federal bureau of investigation. Any records of
criminal history obtained shall be available for qualified entities to
use only for the purpose of screening covered individuals, independent
contractors, vendor employees, or volunteers of the qualified entity
who have supervised or unsupervised access to vulnerable populations.
(6) Determination as to the fitness of a person to have responsibility
for the safety and well-being of vulnerable populations shall be the sole re-
sponsibility of the qualified entity that submitted the request for screen-
ing.
(7) The bureau may audit any qualified entity that submits a request
for screening pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to ensure compli-
ance with all applicable state and federal laws. Each qualified entity shall
maintain all signed waivers allowing such requests for the purpose of an au-
dit for at least one (1) audit cycle or for as long as the screened individual
is employed by or volunteers for the qualified entity, whichever is greater.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Covered individual" means an individual who has, seeks to have, or
may have access to children, the elderly, or individuals with disabili-
ties served by a qualified entity and:
(i) Is employed by, volunteers with, or seeks to be employed by or
volunteer with a qualified entity;
(ii) Owns or operates, or seeks to own or operate, a qualified en-
tity; or
(iii) Is an independent contractor or vendor working or volunteer-
ing in the same capacity as an employee or volunteer of a qualified
entity.
(b) "Qualified entity" means a business or organization, whether pub-
lic, private, for-profit, not-for-profit, or volunteer, that meets the
qualifications to participate in criminal history records screening
pursuant to P.L. 103-209, the national child protection act of 1993, as
amended, and 28 CFR 105, subpart D, the child protection improvements
act.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.